Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 43

Cabinet-Level Departments of the Executive Branch

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 565, § 1, provided: “Legislative Findings and Intent.

“(a)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 to reorganize state government shall result in efficiencies to reduce the duplication of services and administrative costs to reduce overall state government general revenue expenditures.

“(c)Cabinet-level departments shall identify and eliminate excess administrative expenses, unnecessary expenditures, and duplication of services and present those savings and efforts to operate efficiently to the General Assembly as necessary and appropriate.

“(d)(1)The secretary of each cabinet-level department created by the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 shall submit and present to a joint meeting of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs two (2) weeks prior to the first scheduled day of the fiscal session of 2020, a report that includes, without limitation information that shows:

“(A)A summary of the proposed reduction in the total general revenue expenditures of the transferred state entities compared to the general revenue expenditures of the transferred state entities in the 2019 fiscal year by no less than one percent (1%);

“(B)The 2019 fiscal year general revenue expenditures for each state entity that has been merged, consolidated or otherwise combined;

“(C)The total amount of general revenue expenditures for the 2019 fiscal year by each cabinet-level department, including the identification of all funding sources of the cabinet-level department;

“(D)The total number of positions currently authorized for each state entity that has been transferred, merged, consolidated, or otherwise combined and a total for each cabinet-level department; and

“(E)A detailed statement of each cabinet-level departments plan to reduce general revenue expenditures and create efficiency including without limitation:

“(i)The elimination of certain positions;

“(ii)The reduction in operating expenses;

“(iii)The elimination or reduction of programs or services and the cost of the programs or services; and

“(iv)Other reductions in expenses or costs that may be identified.

“(2)The secretary of each cabinet-level department shall submit his or her report to the Governor or his or her designee for approval before submitting the report to the General Assembly.

“(3)It is the intent of the General Assembly that the secretary of each cabinet-level department under the direction of the Governor, has the initiative and resourcefulness to implement efficiency measures that benefit the State of Arkansas.

“(e)Funding for the Department of Education Public School Fund Account for kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12), Medicaid, or any state institution of higher education, board, commission, constitutional officer, or state agency that was not transferred, merged, consolidated, or otherwise combined by the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 as enacted by the General Assembly shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

“(f)(1)The Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs are authorized to meet jointly to review each cabinet-level departments plan to reduce general revenue expenditures as set out in this section.

“(2)The Chair of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Chair of the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs, or his or her designee, shall alternate the acting chair for the joint meetings required by this section.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 1, provided: “Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019.

“(a)This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019’.

“(b)(1)If a provision of this act requires a director, commissioner, or other executive head of a state entity to consult with the secretary of a cabinet-level department regarding a duty or function of the state entity, ‘consultation’ means:

“(A)(i)When working on behalf of a governing state entity, coordinating with and receiving input, review, and recommendations from the secretary of the cabinet-level department.

“(ii)‘Consultation’ under subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section does not include approval or consent; and

“(B)When working on behalf of a state entity other than a governing state entity, coordinating with and receiving input, review, recommendations, advice, and consent of the secretary of the cabinet-level department.

“(2)As used in this subsection, ‘governing state entity’ means a state entity, including without limitation a board, commission, or council, whose membership consists of:

“(A)Two (2) or more appointed members;

“(B)Two (2) or more ex-officio members; or

“(C)Both appointed and ex-officio members.

“(c)As used in this act, ‘state entity’ means any instrumentality of state government, including without limitation a board, commission, committee, advisory board, office, department, institution, bureau, council, administrative program, agency, or division.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6342, provided: “Boards and commissions — Terms.

“(a)Except as provided in this act, including without limitation this section, the members of a board, commission, committee, task force, or similar state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this act shall:

“(1)Continue to be selected in the same manner as provided by Arkansas law; and

“(2)Serve for the terms provided for under Arkansas law.

“(b)To the extent that membership or service on a board, commission, committee, task force, or similar state entity relates to the holding of an office or title, the membership of the board, commission, committee, task force, or similar state entity at issue shall be revised to include the appropriate official under this act if:

“(1)The name of the office or title is revised under this act; or

“(2)The holder of the office or title changes by the operation of this act.

“(c)(1)(A)Beginning July 1, 2019, the members of the council shall serve three-year terms.

“(B)The terms of the members serving on the Health Information Exchange Council prior to August 1, 2019, shall expire on July 1, 2019, and the Secretary of the Department of Health shall make appointments to begin on July 1, 2019.

“(2)(A)The appointed members of the council beginning their appointments on July 1, 2019, shall draw lots for the staggering of terms so that:

“(i)Five (5) members serve terms of one (1) year;

“(ii)Six (6) members serve terms of two (2) years; and

“(iii)Six (6) members serve terms of three (3) years.

“(B)Subsequent appointees to the council shall serve terms of three (3) years.

“(3)A member may be re-appointed to serve on the council.

“(4)In the event of a vacancy on the council, a person may be appointed to serve the remainder of the term”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-43-101. Cabinet-level departments established.

This chapter establishes the cabinet-level departments of the executive branch under the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-102. Legislative findings and intent — Construction.

The General Assembly finds that this chapter is necessary to:

Reorganize the structure of state government;

Improve the delivery of services to the people of this state;

Provide sufficient flexibility to meet changing conditions;

Establish a clear and orderly organizational structure of state government;

Provide a reasonable opportunity to create budgetary and administrative efficiencies within an orderly organizational structure of state government;

Effect the grouping of state entities primarily according to function into a limited number of cabinet-level departments; and

Minimize overlapping of authority and duplication of effort.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for an orderly transfer of certain powers, duties, and functions of the various state entities as described herein to the cabinet-level departments with a minimum of disruption to governmental services and functions and with a minimum of expense.

This chapter shall be liberally construed.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise provided by law:

“Administrative functions” means the day-to-day business operations of a state entity, including without limitation employment, payroll, property management, benefit management, human resource operations, and accounting operations of a state entity, and all other duties as assigned by the secretary of the cabinet-level department or his or her designee.

“Administrative functions” does not include the promulgation of rules or issuance of orders on behalf of any state entity unless specifically designated by statute, rule, order, or directive;

“Cabinet-level department” means one (1) of the fifteen (15) executive agencies designated to provide state services and provide direct reports to the Governor;

“Cabinet-level department transfer” means a transfer of the administrative functions of a state entity to a cabinet-level department under this chapter;

“Employee” means a person employed to carry out the functions of a state entity; and

“State entity” means any instrumentality of state government, including without limitation a board, commission, committee, advisory board, office, department, institution, bureau, council, administrative program, agency, or division.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-104. Cabinet-level departments.

The following cabinet-level departments are created:

The Department of Agriculture;

The Department of Commerce;

The Department of Corrections;

The Department of Education;

The Department of Energy and Environment;

The Department of Finance and Administration;

The Department of Health;

The Department of Human Services;

The Department of the Inspector General;

The Department of Labor and Licensing;

The Department of the Military;

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

The Department of Public Safety;

The Department of Transformation and Shared Services; and

The Department of Veterans Affairs.

All cabinet-level departments are executive agencies and report to the Governor.

The General Assembly may prescribe duties to the cabinet-level departments and the various state entities that are administered by the cabinet-level departments.

Each cabinet-level department shall consist of the state entities transferred by a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter and other state entities as provided by law.

A state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall be administered under the direction and supervision of the cabinet-level department but shall otherwise continue to exercise the stated statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions as exercised before the cabinet-level department transfer, unless otherwise provided by law, including without limitation:

The promulgation of rules;

The collection of fees;

The licensing, certification, or registration authority over designated occupations; and

The creation of programs unless otherwise provided by law.

Any revenue, including without limitation cash funds, special revenue, trust fund income, federal grants, aid, reimbursements, nonrevenue receipts, and other moneys, securities and investments held in accounts by a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter, including without limitation unexpended balances that may be carried forward:

Shall not be transferred to the cabinet-level department;

Shall continue to be held in the accounts; and

Shall be used solely for the purposes for which the revenue was collected as provided by law.

Revenue under subdivision (f)(1) of this section includes revenue regardless of when collected, including without limitation revenue collected after July 1, 2019.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2) of this section, all records, employees, unexpended balances of state appropriations or state allocations, and functions of budgeting and purchasing of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter are transferred to the cabinet-level department.

All records pertaining to bonds issued by a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall remain with the state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter.

All real property owned in fee simple by a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall remain in the name of the state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter, to be administered by the cabinet-level department.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (h)(2)(B) or (h)(2)(C) of this section, all other property of the state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter, including without limitation real property not subject to subdivision (h)(1) of this section, personal property, fixtures, contracts, and assignable leases, shall be transferred to the cabinet-level department.

Any property constructed using special or cash revenue of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall remain the property of the state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter.

Contracts, instruments, or securities pertaining to or made in connection with the issuance of bonds or financing of programs shall not be transferred to the cabinet-level department by a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter.

A state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter may continue to use all remaining stationery, branded material, or other similar items until the stationery, branded material, or other similar items are expended.

A state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter currently designated as a public body politic and corporate shall continue as a public body politic and corporate.

Bonds or other obligations of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter currently designated as a public body politic and corporate shall:

Continue to state on their face that such bonds are obligations only of the state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter; and

In no event constitute:

An indebtedness of the State of Arkansas;

An indebtedness for which the faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or any of its revenue are pledged; or

A secured lien on or a security interest in property of the state.

A cabinet-level department shall:

Make contracts, grants, and employ, to the extent funds are available, such employees as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the cabinet-level department and each state entity administered by the cabinet-level department; and

Perform all administrative functions of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter, unless otherwise provided by law.

Share business and administrative services across each cabinet-level department as determined necessary by the secretary of the cabinet-level department.

The bond under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this section shall be conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform his or her duties of employment and properly account for all funds received and disbursed by him or her.

The bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State and an executed counterpart of the bond shall be filed with the Auditor of State.

(1)Unless otherwise provided by law, each division of the cabinet-level department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary of the cabinet-level department may, unless otherwise provided by law:

There is hereby created one (1) new classification and position for the executive head for each cabinet-level department, designated as follows:

Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration;

Secretary of the Department of Health;

Secretary of the Department of Human Services;

Secretary of the Department of Inspector General;

Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing;

Secretary of the Department of the Military;

Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

Secretary of the Department of Public Safety;

Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services; and

Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs.

When working on behalf of a governing state entity, coordinating with and receiving input, review, and recommendations from the secretary of the cabinet-level department.

“Consultation” under this subdivision (f)(1)(A) does not include approval or consent; and

When working on behalf of a state entity other than a governing state entity, coordinating with and receiving input, review, recommendations, advice, and consent of the secretary of the cabinet-level department.

As used in this subsection, “governing state entity” means a state entity, including without limitation a board, commission, or council, whose membership consists of:

Two (2) or more appointed members;

Two (2) or more ex-officio members; or

Both appointed and ex-officio members.

(1)The General Assembly finds that:

The transformation of the structure of state government under the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 involves changes to thousands of sections of the Arkansas Code concerning state entities;

Many of the changes required are highly technical and require careful study of the purpose and context of each Arkansas Code section, with the need for some of the changes not becoming apparent until the implementation of the transformation of state government under this chapter;

With a project as large and comprehensive as the transformation of state government under this chapter, it is inevitable that certain sections of the Arkansas Code requiring technical changes to follow the intent of this chapter will be either omitted or amended in a manner that is later found to be erroneous and unintentional; and

If the correct statutory change to remedy an unintentional error is readily apparent and consistent with the intent of this chapter, the unintentional error should be corrected as part of the codification process due to the technical nature of the unintentional error.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to empower the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to correct technical errors identified in the Arkansas Code during the transformation of the structure of state government under this chapter to allow this chapter to be fully implemented.

(1)(A)Any person or state entity identifying one (1) or more sections of the Arkansas Code that require revision to implement the intent of this chapter may notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research or his or her designee of the section or sections at issue.

If the Bureau of Legislative Research, while assisting the commission with the commission's powers and duties, becomes aware of one (1) or more sections of the Arkansas Code that require revision to implement the intent of this chapter for which it appears that the bureau and the commission do not have authority to make the necessary revision under § 1-2-303(d), the bureau may notify the commission of the section or sections at issue.

If the commission determines that the revision necessary to one (1) or more sections of the Arkansas Code under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is technical in nature, germane to the intent of this chapter, and consistent with this chapter's policy and purposes, the commission may make the revision to the Arkansas Code.

(A)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(4)(B) of this section, when the commission approves a revision to the Arkansas Code under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the commission shall notify the following of the revision within thirty (30) days:

The commission shall notify the publisher of the Arkansas Code of a revision to the Arkansas Code under subdivision (b)(2) of this section as soon as possible so that the revision may be reflected in the official hard copy version of the Arkansas Code and official electronic version of the Arkansas Code.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

The Legislative Council.

The commission is not required to make a notification under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section if the revision is made under § 1-2-303(d).

The authority granted to the commission under this section is supplemental to the commission's authority under § 1-2-303.

A fund or fund account name that due to the implementation of the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 has not been revised in an appropriation or in the Arkansas Code to the same fund or fund account name enacted by the Ninety-Second General Assembly, shall be payable from the appropriation enacted with the fund or fund account name as originally enacted by the Ninety-Second General Assembly.

Unless otherwise provided by law, when all or part of a state entity is subject to a cabinet-level department transfer, the state entity's authorized classifications, employees, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and funds are transferred to the cabinet-level department as authorized under this chapter.

(1)A state entity appropriation transferred from a paying account or fund not established in a cabinet-level department, due to the implementation of the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019, is payable and appropriated from a cash fund established in the State Treasury in the same amount and for the same purpose as that transferred state entity.

(1)Any classification title for a state entity that is subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter may be revised as determined appropriate by the Office of Personnel Management to reference the appropriate state entity.

A pay grade;

A line item;

The number of authorized classifications; or

A job duty.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019, if a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter is subject to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33:

The Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 shall not abridge, diminish, or curtail, in any respect, the authority or responsibilities vested in a state entity that is subject to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33, and affiliated with a cabinet-level department under the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 177, § 40, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of the State and Auditor of State for the payment of all personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the state shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State. (2) The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(2)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(3)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-105. Cabinet-level department transfers.

The administrative functions of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall be administered under the direction and supervision of the cabinet-level department into which the state entity is transferred.

A state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer of the state entity's administrative functions under this chapter shall make available to the cabinet-level department all records of the administrative functions of the state entity, unless otherwise provided by law.

(1)The employees of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall be considered employees of the cabinet-level department.

The job descriptions, duties, salaries, and benefits of the employee positions shall be determined by the secretary of the cabinet-level department as consistent with Arkansas law, unless otherwise provided by law.

The employees of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall be compensated in accordance with the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., except as otherwise provided by law.

The programs and positions funded by special funds allocated by law to a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter shall continue to be used for the designated purposes of the programs and positions.

This section does not reduce any right that an employee of a state entity transferred subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter has under any civil service or merit system.

A cabinet-level department shall provide all administrative support, employment needs, and staff to carry out the orders, rules, regulations, directives, and standards promulgated or issued by the state entities subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter, unless otherwise provided by law.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-106. Cabinet-level departments — Powers and duties.

Execute the powers and duties prescribed by law;

Administer each state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter;

A cabinet-level department may:

Assist other state entities and federal departments, agencies, boards, commissions, and institutions, by performing services in conformity with the purposes of the cabinet-level department;

Maintain and administer real property on behalf of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter, unless otherwise provided by law;

Maintain and administer all other property on behalf of a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter, unless otherwise provided by law;

Provide administrative support, employment needs, and staff to carry out the orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards promulgated or issued by each state entity over which the cabinet-level department has administrative control; and

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-107. Effect on preexisting rules, regulations, etc.

The Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 does not affect the orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards made or promulgated prior to the effective date of the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 by a state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under this chapter.

The orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards under subsection (a) of this section shall continue with full force and effect until amended or repealed pursuant to authority given by law.

The following shall not be impaired in any way by the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 and shall continue with full force and effect:

Bonds issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority;

Contracts and obligations securing bonds issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority or pertaining to bonds issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority; and

Programs financed by bonds issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-108. Cabinet-level department secretary — Definition.

A secretary of a cabinet-level department shall, unless otherwise provided by law:

Be the executive head of each cabinet-level department;

Be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate;

Serve at the pleasure of the Governor;

Before entering upon his or her respective duties, take and subscribe to and file in the office of the Secretary of State, the oath under Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 20, that he or she will support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution and faithfully perform the duties upon which he or she is about to enter; and

(A)Furnish bond to the state, with a corporate surety, in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

The secretary of the cabinet-level department shall hire department employees, unless otherwise provided by law.

Delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the cabinet-level department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the cabinet-level department;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the cabinet-level department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the cabinet-level department if the secretary of the cabinet-level department also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

Secretary of the Department of Agriculture;

Secretary of the Department of Commerce;

Secretary of the Department of Corrections;

Secretary of the Department of Education;

Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment;

The secretary of a cabinet-level department may be compelled by mandamus to perform any duties or obligations under a bond, contract, or agreement issued, made, or to be performed by each state entity administered by the cabinet-level department.

(1)If a provision of the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 requires a director, commissioner, or other executive head of a state entity to consult with the secretary of a cabinet-level department regarding a duty or function of the state entity, “consultation” means:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-109. Correction of technical errors related to transformation of state government.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-110. Funds and personnel transferred.

At no time may funding or cash fund appropriation be established under subdivision (c)(1) of this section that is not authorized to be transferred or in a greater amount than is transferred.

The authority under subdivision (d)(1) of this section does not allow for revisions to:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

25-43-111. State entity subject to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33.

The state entity subject to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33, and the institutions under its authority shall be considered to be affiliated with the cabinet-level department at issue; and

The state entity subject to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33, shall perform all functions with respect to the management and control of the state entity and the institutions under its authority as contemplated by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2.

Subchapter 2

— Department of Agriculture

25-43-201. Department of Agriculture.

There is created the Department of Agriculture as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
3.